District of Columbia statutes.
34-503

Stocks not to be issued until certificate is recorded.

No public utility shall issue any stocks, certificates of stock, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness for money, property, or services, either directly or indirectly, nor shall it receive any money, property, or services in payment of the same, either directly or indirectly, until there shall have been recorded upon the books of such public utility the certificate of the Commission in this subtitle provided for.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 990, ch. 150, § 8, par. 74
1973 Ed., § 43-803.
1981 Ed., § 43-703.
Penal provisions, stock issue by false statements, see § 34-701.